Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.090

Violations bureau.

A violations bureau may be established by any city or district court having jurisdiction of traffic cases to assist in processing traffic cases. As designated by written order of the court having jurisdiction of traffic cases, specific offenses under city ordinance, county resolution, or state law may be processed by such bureau. Such bureau may be authorized to receive the posting of bail for such specified offenses, and, as authorized by the court order, to accept forfeiture of bail and payment of monetary penalties. The court order shall specify the amount of bail to be posted and shall also specify the circumstances or conditions which will require an appearance before the court. Such bureau, upon accepting the prescribed bail, shall issue a receipt to the alleged violator, which receipt shall bear a legend informing him or her of the legal consequences of bail forfeiture. The bureau shall transfer daily to the clerk of the proper department of the court all bail posted for offenses where forfeiture is not authorized by the court order, as well as copies of all receipts. All forfeitures or penalties paid to a violations bureau for violations of municipal ordinances shall be placed in the city general fund or such other fund as may be prescribed by ordinance. All forfeitures or penalties paid to a violations bureau for violations of state laws or county resolutions shall be remitted at least monthly to the county treasurer for deposit in the current expense fund. Employees of violations bureaus of a city shall be city employees under any applicable municipal civil service system.

[ 2011 c 336 s 73; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 15; 1971 c 73 s 4; 1961 c 299 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.